District of Columbia statutes.
9-1201.05

Denomination of streets as “business streets”.

The Council of the District of Columbia is authorized and directed to denominate portions of streets in the District of Columbia as “business streets” and to authorize the use, on such portions of streets, for business purposes by abutting property owners, under such general regulations as said Council may prescribe, of so much of the sidewalk and parking as may not be needed, in the judgment of said Council, by the general public, under the following conditions, namely:

(1)

Wherein a portion of a street not already denominated a business street a majority of a frontage not less than 3 blocks in length is occupied and used for business purposes; and

(2)

Where a portion of a street has already been denominated a business street, and there exists adjoining such portion a block or more whose frontage is occupied and used for business purposes.

Feb. 2, 1904, 33 Stat. 10, ch. 89
Highway plans, jurisdiction of mayor over roads and bridges, see § 9-101.02.
Regulation of traffic, parking, see § 50-2201.03.
Regulations necessary for the protection of lives, limbs, health, comfort, and quiet, see § 1-303.03.
Rental and utilization of public space, see § 10-1101.01 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 7-1405.
1973 Ed., § 7-1205.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(173) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.